Illinois, session 104th, HB4758.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Job Opportunities for Qualified Applicants 5Act is amended by changing Section 10 and by adding Section 17 6as follows: 7    (820 ILCS 75/10)8    Sec. 10. Definitions. As used in this Act: 9    "Applicant" means any person pursuing employment with an 10employer or with or through an employment agency. 11    "Driver's license" means any license or privilege to 12operate a motor vehicle issued under the laws of this State.13    "Employer" means any person or private entity that has 15 14or more employees in the current or preceding calendar year, 15and any agent of such an entity or person. 16    "Employment agency" means any person or entity regularly 17undertaking with or without compensation to procure employees 18for an employer or to procure for employees opportunities to 19work for an employer and includes an agent of such a person. 20    "Employment" means any occupation or vocation. 21(Source: P.A. 98-774, eff. 1-1-15.) 22    (820 ILCS 75/17 new)  HB4758 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 19331 SPS 32778 b1    Sec. 17. Driver's licenses. An employer or employment 2agency may not include in any specific job posting a statement 3that an applicant must have a valid driver's license, unless 4driving is one of the essential functions of the posted job and 5is a business necessity. If a job requires a valid driver's 6license, the employer or employment agency shall include in 7the job posting a brief description explaining why a valid 8driver's license is required. 9    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect January 101, 2027.